District of Columbia statutes.
28-5210

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-282, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2132